Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 28.4 Controlled Substances Therapeutic
Research Act

21-28.4-1.
Controlled substances therapeutic research program established — Participation.

There is established within the department of health the “controlled substances therapeutic research program.” The program shall be administered by the director of health or the director’s designee. The department shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary for proper administration of this chapter.

The controlled substances therapeutic research program shall be limited to patients who are certified by a practitioner as being involved in a life-threatening or sense-threatening situation and who are not responding to conventional drug therapies or where these conventional therapies have proven effective but expose the patient to intolerable side effects.

The director of health is authorized to protect the privacy of individuals who are participants in the controlled substances therapeutic program by withholding from all persons not directly connected with the conduct of the program the names and other identifying characteristics of the participants. Persons who are given this authorization shall not be compelled in any civil, criminal, administrative, legislative, or other proceeding to identify the individuals who are participants in the controlled substances therapeutic research program, except to the extent necessary to permit the director of health to determine whether the controlled substances therapeutic program is being conducted in accordance with the authorization.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 375, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 236, § 1.

21-28.4-2.
Review of program applications and practitioners.

The director of health or the director’s designee shall review all applicants for the controlled substances therapeutic research program and their licensed practitioners, and certify their participation in the program.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 236, § 1.

21-28.4-3.
Acquisition of supplies.

The director of health is authorized to apply for controlled substances in schedule I of §

21-28-2.08

, in accordance with the provisions of §

21-31-16

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 375, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 41.

21-28.4-4.
Distribution of supplies.

The director of health shall cause the controlled substances to be dispensed to the certified patient by a practitioner or facility approved by the director of health. The director of health shall file the names of certified practitioners and facilities with the secretary of state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 375, § 1.

21-28.4-5.
Form of record.

The form of records and who shall keep records shall be the same as required by §

21-28-3.16

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 375, § 1.

21-28.4-6.
Security.

The security requirements for controlled substances used shall be the same as those provided for in §

21-28-3.28

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 375, § 1.

21-28.4-7.
Report.

The director of health shall report his or her findings and recommendations to the governor and the legislature on an annual basis.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 375, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 236, § 1.

21-28.4-8.
Disposition of controlled substances.

Excess or undesired controlled substances used in the controlled substances therapeutic research program shall be disposed of in accordance with the provisions of §

21-28-5.07

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 375, § 1.

21-28.4-9.
Enforcement.

It is the duty of the department of health and its agents designated by the director of health to enforce all provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 375, § 1.

21-28.4-10.
Penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter, the penalty for which is not specified in the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, chapter 28 of this title, or of the rules and regulations of the director of health made under authority of this chapter, shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not more than one year, a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 375, § 1.

21-28.4-11.
Appropriations.

The director of health shall provide necessary space, personnel, and material to carry out the provisions of this chapter. Extra costs incurred shall be annually submitted by the director of health in the director’s budget request in a one-line item for the controlled substance therapeutic research program.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 375, § 1.